Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Creation, Administration, and Management of the Assets of the Fund

47-12-20.
Creation of the office of district attorney emeritus.

There is created the office of district attorney emeritus.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 780, § 1.

47-12-21.
Creation of the fund; membership of the board of trustees; payments to the fund.

There is created the District Attorneys Retirement Fund of Georgia.

The board of trustees of the fund shall be the Governor, the state treasurer, and an appointee of the Governor who is not the Attorney General. All payments to this fund shall be made to the board of trustees.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 780, § 7; Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 15; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “state treasurer” for “director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (b).

47-12-22.
Power of board of trustees to make rules and regulations for the administration of the fund.

The board of trustees is authorized to make such rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter for the proper administration of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 780, § 14.

47-12-23.
Power of board of trustees to invest money received under this chapter.

The board of trustees shall have authority to invest any of the money received under this chapter in such manner as funds of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia are invested and reinvested.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 780, § 15; Ga. L. 1995, p. 651, § 7.

47-12-24.
Annual audit of the fund.

The state auditor is authorized to make an annual audit of the fund.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 780, § 16.

47-12-25.
Administration of the fund.

The trustees shall contract with the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia for the administration of the fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-12-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 787, § 3.